Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508, as
last amended by Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 4359 of the 2nd
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1210.508. A. 1. By no later than December 31, 2016,
the State Board of Education shall adopt a statewide system of
student assessments in compliance with the Elementary and Secondary
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 2

Education Act of 1965 (ESEA), as reauthorized and amended by P.L.
No. 114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA).
2. The statewide student assessment system adopted by the Board
pursuant to this subsection shall be aligned with the Oklahoma
Academic Standards as adopted by the Board and which prepare
students for college and careers.
B. 1. The Board shall issue a request for proposals for the
selection of assessments to be administered to students in grades
three through twelve as a part of the statewide student assessment
system adopted by the Board pursuant to this section.
2. The Board shall adopt assessments from the selected
proposals that were submitted pursuant to paragraph 1 of this
subsection. The adopted assessments shall be administered by the
Board for a period that is in coordination with the six-year subject
area textbook adoption cycle unless the vendor does not fulfill the
terms of the contract or fails to comply with or violates the terms
of the contract. The Board shall administer the assessments
beginning with the 2017-2018 school year.
C. The statewide student assessment system adopted by the Board
pursuant to this section shall include assessments that:
1. Are aligned with the Oklahoma subject matter standards as
adopted by the Board;
2. Provide a measure of comparability among other states;
3. Yield both norm-referenced scores and criterion-referenced
scores;
4. Have a track record of statistical reliability and accuracy;
and
5. For assessments administered in high school, provide a
measure of future academic performance.
D. For the 2016-2017 school year, the Board shall administer
assessments in:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 3

1. English Language Arts or reading and mathematics in grades
three through eight and at least once in high school, during the
grade span of nine through twelve;
2. Science not less than once during each grade span of three
through five, six through nine, and ten through twelve; and
3. United States History not less than once during the grade
span of nine through twelve.
E. 1. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, the statewide
student assessment system shall include assessments in:
a. English Language Arts and mathematics in grades three
through eight and at least once in high school, during
the grade span of nine through twelve,
b. science not less than once during each grade span of
three through five, six through nine, and ten through
twelve, and
c. United States History, with an emphasis on civics, not
less than once during the grade span of nine through
twelve.
2. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, the statewide
student assessment system may include:
a. assessments in reading, writing, and mathematics in
certain grades as determined by the Board, and
b. contingent upon the availability of funds, an
additional nationally recognized college- and career-
readiness assessment or assessments as recommended by
the State Department of Education, which will be
administered to students in high school at no cost to
the student.
F. 1. Beginning with students entering the ninth grade in the
2017-2018 school year, each student shall take the assessment or
assessments included in the statewide student assessment system
adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection A of this section in
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 4

order to graduate from a public high school with a standard diploma.
All students shall take the assessment or assessments prior to
graduation, unless otherwise exempt by law.
2. Beginning with students entering the ninth grade in the
2017-2018 school year, each student, in addition to taking the
assessment or assessments included in the statewide student
assessment system adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection A of
this section, shall meet any other high school graduation
requirements adopted by the Board pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd Session of the 55th Oklahoma
Legislature in order to graduate from a public high school with a
standard diploma.
3. For students who start the ninth grade prior to or during
the 2016-2017 school year, school districts shall adopt a plan that
establishes the assessment or assessments those students are
required to take in order to graduate from a public high school with
a standard diploma. The plan may also include any or all of the
other high school graduation requirements adopted by the Board
pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd
Session of the 55th Oklahoma Legislature that those students will be
required to meet in order to graduate from a public high school with
a standard diploma.
4. The Board shall promulgate rules to ensure that students who
transfer into an Oklahoma a school district in this state from out-
of-state after the junior year of high school shall not be denied
the opportunity to be awarded a standard diploma due to differing
testing requirements.
G. In order to provide an indication of the levels of
competency attained by the student in a permanent record for
potential future employers and institutions of higher education,
school districts shall report on the high school transcript of the
student the highest-achieved score on the assessment or assessments
included in the statewide student assessment system adopted by the
Board pursuant to subsection A of this section and any business- and
industry-recognized endorsements attained.
H. Students who do not perform at a proficiency level on
assessments shall be remediated as established in the assessment
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 5

requirements adopted by the Board pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd Session of the 55th Oklahoma
Legislature, subject to the availability of funding.
I. 1. All assessments required by this section shall measure
academic competencies in correlation with the subject matter
standards adopted by the Board pursuant to Sections 11-103.6 and 11-
103.6a of this title and referred to as the Oklahoma Academic
Standards. The State Board of Education shall evaluate the subject
matter standards to ensure the competencies reflect high standards,
are specific, well-defined, measurable, and challenging, and will
prepare elementary students for next-grade-level course work and
secondary students for postsecondary studies at institutions of
higher education or technology center schools without the need for
remediation. All subject matter standards shall reflect the goals
as set forth in Section 11-103.6 of this title and of improving the
state average of college entrance exam scores.
2. The State Department of Education shall annually evaluate
the results of the assessments. The State Board of Education shall
ensure that preliminary results for all statewide assessments are
reported to districts no later than June 20 of each year and are
presented in a manner that yields detailed, diagnostic information
for the purpose of guiding instruction and student remediation. As
improvements are made to the assessments required by this section,
the Board shall seek to increase the depth of knowledge assessed for
each subject. The State Board of Education shall seek to ensure
that data yielded from the assessments required in this section are
is utilized at the school district level to inform instruction,
professional development, school improvement, and remediation for
students.
3. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability
shall determine the cut scores for the performance levels on all
statewide assessments. The Commission shall conduct an ongoing
review to compare the statewide assessment content and performance
descriptors with those of other states. Upon receipt of the review,
the Commission may adjust the cut scores as necessary.
4. The State Board of Education, for the purposes of conducting
reliability and validity studies, monitoring contractor adherence to
professionally accepted testing standards, and providing
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 6

recommendations for testing program improvement, shall retain the
services of an established, independent agency or organization that
is nationally recognized for its technical expertise in educational
testing but is not engaged in the development of aptitude or
achievement tests for elementary or secondary level grades. These
national assessment experts shall annually conduct studies of the
reliability and validity of the statewide assessments administered
pursuant to this section. Validity studies shall include studies of
decision validity and concurrent validity.
J. 1. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules
setting the assessment window dates for each statewide assessment so
that the assessments are administered according to recommended
testing protocols and so that the assessment results are reported
back to school districts in a timely manner. The vendor shall
provide a final electronic data file of all school site, school
district, and state results to the State Department of Education and
the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability prior to August
20 of each year. The Department shall forward the final data files
for each school district and each school site in that district to
the school district. The Board shall ensure the contract with the
vendor includes a provision that the vendor report assessment
results directly to the Office of Educational Quality and
Accountability at the same time it is they are reported to the
Board.
2. State, district, and site level results of all assessments
required in this section shall be disaggregated by gender, race,
ethnicity, disability status, migrant status, English proficiency,
and status as economically disadvantaged, except that such
disaggregation shall not be required in a case in which the number
of students in a category is insufficient to yield statistically
reliable information or the results would reveal personally
identifiable information about an individual student. Each school
site shall notify the student’s parents or legal guardians of the
school’s performance levels in the Oklahoma School Testing Program
as reported in the Oklahoma Educational Indicators Program at the
end of each school year.
K. The State Board of Education shall be responsible for the
field-testing and validation of the statewide assessment system
required in subsection A of this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 7

L. The State Board of Education shall develop, administer, and
incorporate as a part of the Oklahoma School Testing Program other
assessment programs or procedures including appropriate
accommodations for the assessment of students with disabilities as
required by the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA),
20 U.S.C., Section 1400 et seq.
M. For purposes of developing and administering alternate
assessments for students with the most significant cognitive
disabilities, the State Board of Education shall not be subject to
subsections D and E of Section 11-103.6a of this title.
N. By December 15, 2026 December 15, 2028, and annually
thereafter, the State Board of Education shall electronically submit
a report to the Legislature containing data collected for the most
recently completed school year on the number and demographics of
students who were eligible for advanced mathematics courses, the
number and demographics of students who were placed in advanced
mathematics courses, the number and demographics of students placed
in mathematics intervention courses, and the number and demographics
of students not placed in advanced mathematic courses or mathematic
intervention courses. The report shall include information on the
type and format of advanced mathematic courses and the type and
format of mathematic intervention courses.
O. The State Board of Education shall provide guidance on how
to best develop programming and courses to ensure all impacted
students receive rigorous, academically appropriate instruction in
mathematics.
P. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, and for each
school year thereafter, all assessments required by this section
administered in grades three through eight shall be administered
within the last four (4) weeks of the school year. The testing
window required by this subsection shall not apply to assessments
administered as part of the Oklahoma Alternate Assessment Program
for students with the most significant cognitive disabilities.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 492, O.S.L.
2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1210.900), is amended to read as
follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 8

Section 1210.900. A. Sections 2 This section through 8 Section
1210.907 of this act title shall be known and may be cited as the
“Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency Act”.
B. The Legislature finds that it is essential for children
enrolled in the public schools in this state to develop strong
mathematical proficiency early and consistently. The Legislature
further finds that clear and visible goals, assessments to determine
math proficiency at each school, the use of scientifically based and
researched methodologies in math instruction, along with regular and
periodic measurements of school math improvement, and accountability
at each level of the educational system will result in a significant
increase in the number of children performing at or above grade
level in mathematics.
C. The purpose of the Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency
Act is to ensure that student achievement in math is encouraged and
progression from one grade to another is determined, in part, upon
proficiency in mathematics, that school district board of education
policies facilitate promotion of advanced math instruction and
intervention services to address student math needs, and that each
student and his or her parent or legal guardian be informed of the
student’s progress in mathematics.
D. Each public school district in this state shall ensure that
all students receive a well-rounded education focused on building
deep foundations in mathematics, reading, and writing. The State
Board of Education shall encourage school districts to integrate the
teaching of the other curricular areas in subject matter standards
adopted by the Board with the instruction of mathematics, reading,
and writing.
E. All teachers of mathematics in the public schools in this
state shall have access to training in evidence-based professional
development programs to deepen their content knowledge, learn
specific effective and impactful teaching strategies, and develop
productive dispositions toward math, and then incorporate into
instruction the foundational elements of math instruction, including
the development of grade-level appropriate mathematical proficiency
which is a combination of real-world problem-solving skills,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 9

procedural fluency, conceptual understanding, and productive
dispositions.
F. 1. There is hereby created within the State Department of
Education an Office of Mathematics Improvement, which shall be
created within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act.
The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint a Director of
the Office of Mathematics Improvement whose exclusive focus shall be
mathematics instruction for students in grades kindergarten through
five. The Director shall have experience in administrative duties,
in teaching mathematics in a public or private elementary school,
and as an elementary mathematics specialist, coach, or
administrator.
2. The Director of the Office of Mathematics Improvement shall:
a. monitor implementation of a single statewide screening
instrument, diagnostic assessments, and formative
assessments for grades kindergarten through five to
identify students in need of support for key numeracy
concepts,
b. recommend training and support for educators for the
effective implementation and interpretation of
diagnostic tools. The diagnostic tool shall be used
with students who have been identified with
deficiencies in mathematics based on a single
statewide screening instrument, diagnostic
assessments, formative assessments, benchmark
assessments, teacher observation, or any combination
thereof,
c. designate a team of educators to explore the
connection between difficulties with number sense and
dyscalculia as well as possible effective screening
instruments,
d. commit necessary resources to understanding the needs
of students struggling with number sense or
dyscalculia, or both, before implementing
instructional practices or assessments that could
adversely affect student learning,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 10

e. monitor the implementation and progress of summer
mathematics academies,
f. recommend changes and improvements to any professional
development providers and public schools in this state
based on data collected and analyzed by the Office of
Mathematics Improvement, and
g. monitor the implementation and progress of the
Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency Act.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 492, O.S.L.
2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1210.901), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1210.901. A. To identify students who have a math
deficiency including students with characteristics of dyscalculia,
each student enrolled in second, third, fourth, and fifth grade in a
public school in this state shall be screened at the beginning,
middle, and end of each school year for math proficiency including,
but not limited to, real-world problem-solving skills, procedural
fluency, conceptual understanding, and productive dispositions. A
screening instrument approved by the State Board of Education
pursuant to the provisions of Section 1210.508C of this title shall
be utilized for the purposes of this section. The screening
instrument as described in Section 1210.508C of this title shall be
a single instrument that measures both math and reading skills. In
determining which screening instrument to approve, the State Board
of Education shall take into consideration, at a minimum, the
following factors:
1. The time required to conduct the screening instrument with
the intention of minimizing the impact on instructional time;
2. The timeliness in reporting screening instrument results to
teachers, administrators, and parents or legal guardians of
students; and
3. The integration of the screening instrument into the math
curriculum.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 11

B. Beginning School districts shall administer the screening
instrument described in subsection A of this section beginning in
the 2026-2027 2027-2028 school year, the State Board of Education
shall approve a list of screening instruments for use at the
beginning, middle, and end of the school year for monitoring
progress and measurement of math proficiency as required in
subsection A of this section. The screening instrument shall:
1. Assess mathematical proficiency, which is a combination of
real-world problem-solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual
understanding, and productive dispositions for the grade level as
defined by the state’s subject matter standards;
2. Document the validity and reliability of each assessment;
3. Be used for identifying students who are at risk for math
deficiencies and for progress monitoring throughout the school year;
4. Be used to assess students with disabilities and English
language learners; and
5. Be accompanied by a data management system that provides
profiles of students, class, grade level, and school building. The
profiles shall identify each student’s instructional point of need,
competency for advanced math coursework, and math proficiency level.
The State Board of Education shall also determine other comparable
math assessments for diagnostic purposes to be used for students at
risk of math failure.
C. 1. Exemptions to the screening requirements required by of
this section may be provided to students who have documented
evidence that they meet at least one of the following criteria as
related to the provision of classroom instruction:
a. the student participates in the Oklahoma Alternate
Assessment Program (OAAP) and is taught using
alternate methods,
b. the student’s primary expressive or receptive
communication is sign language,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 12

c. the student’s primary form of written or read text is
Braille, or
d. the student’s primary expressive or receptive language
is not English, the student is identified as an
English learner using a state-approved identification
assessment, and the student has had less than one (1)
school year of instruction in an English-learner
program.
2. A public school that grants an exemption pursuant to
paragraph 1 of this subsection shall provide ongoing evidence of
student progression toward English language acquisition with the
same frequency as administration of screening assessments. Evidence
may include, but not be limited to, student progression toward OAAP
math essential elements, proficiency in sign language and
mathematical reasoning, and proficiency in Braille and mathematical
concepts.
D. 1. Students who are administered a screening instrument
pursuant to subsection A of this section and are found to be
exceeding grade-level targets shall be provided advanced learning
opportunities in mathematics approved for that student’s grade
level. No student who qualifies pursuant to this subsection shall
be removed from the advanced learning opportunity provided to the
student unless a parent or legal guardian of the student provides
written consent for the student to be excluded or removed after
being adequately informed that the student’s placement was
determined by the student’s achievement on the screening instrument.
2. Students who are administered a screening instrument
pursuant to subsection A of this section and are found not to be
meeting grade-level targets shall be provided a program of math
instruction designed to enable students to acquire the appropriate
grade-level math proficiency. The program of math instruction shall
be based on scientific math research and align with the subject
matter standards adopted by the State Board of Education. A program
of math instruction shall include:
a. sufficient additional in-school instructional time for
the acquisition of mathematical proficiency, which is
a combination of real-world problem-solving skills,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 13

procedural fluency, conceptual understanding, and
productive dispositions,
b. if necessary and if funding is available, tutorial
instruction after regular school hours, on Saturdays,
and during summer; however, such instruction may not
be counted toward the one-hundred-eighty-day one-
hundred-eighty-one-day or one-thousand-eighty-hour
one-thousand-eighty-six-hour school year required in
Section 1-109 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title,
c. assessments identified for diagnostic purposes and
periodic monitoring to measure the acquisition of math
proficiency including, but not limited to, real-world
problem-solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual
understanding, and productive dispositions, as
identified in the student’s program of math
instruction,
d. high-quality instructional materials grounded in
scientifically based math research, and
e. a means of providing every family of a student in
second, third, fourth, and fifth grade access to free
online evidence-based math instruction resources to
support the student’s math development at home.
3. A student enrolled in second, third, fourth, and or fifth
grade who exhibits a deficiency in math at any time based on the
screening instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of this
section shall receive an individual math intervention plan no later
than thirty (30) days after the identification of the deficiency in
math. The math intervention plan shall be provided in addition to
core math instruction that is provided to all students. The math
intervention plan shall:
a. describe the research-based math intervention services
the student will receive to remedy the deficiency in
math,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 14

b. provide explicit and systematic instruction in real-
world problem-solving skills, procedural fluency,
conceptual understanding, and productive dispositions,
as applicable,
c. monitor the math progress of each student’s math
proficiency throughout the school year and adjust
instruction according to the student’s needs, and
d. continue until the student is determined to be meeting
grade-level targets in math based on screening
instruments administered pursuant to subsection A of
this section or assessments identified for diagnostic
purposes and periodic monitoring pursuant to
subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of this subsection.
4. The math intervention plan for each student identified with
a deficiency in math shall be developed by a student math
proficiency team and shall include supplemental instructional
services and supports. Each team shall be comprised of:
a. the parent or legal guardian of the student,
b. the teacher assigned to the student who had
responsibility for math instruction in that academic
year,
c. a teacher who is responsible for math instruction and
is assigned to teach in the next grade level of the
student, and
d. a teacher who specializes in math interventions, if
one is available.
5. A school district shall notify the parent or legal guardian
of any student in second, third, fourth, and fifth grade who
exhibits a deficiency in math at any time based on the screening
instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of this section.
The notification shall occur no later than thirty (30) days after
the identification of the deficiency in math.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 15

SECTION 4. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 492, O.S.L.
2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1210.902), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1210.902. A. Contingent on the provision of
appropriated funds designated for the Oklahoma Math Achievement and
Proficiency Act, public each school districts may be allocated
monies district shall receive a base mathematics allocation
calculated on a per-student basis for each enrolled second-, third-,
fourth-, and fifth-grade student as reported in the October 1
enrollment counts of the current school year who is found to be in
need of remediation or intensive intervention services in
mathematics. The State Board of Education shall allocate not less
than forty percent (40%) of funds appropriated for the purposes of
this section to support the base mathematics allocation. The base
mathematics allocation shall be distributed to each public school
district upon approval of the strong math plan for the school
district by the State Board of Education and the submittal of a
child-count report to the State Department of Education that details
the number of students identified as needing remediation or
intensive intervention services in mathematics. To determine a per-
student allocation amount, the total amount of funds available for
allocation each year shall be divided by the total number of
students in the state identified as in need of remediation or
intensive intervention services in mathematics as provided for in
Section 3 of this act. Each public school district shall be
allocated an amount equal to the per-student allocation amount
multiplied by the number of identified students enrolled in the
school district support the prevention of math deficiencies and the
implementation of strong core math instruction within Tier 1 of a
multi-tiered system of supports (MTSS) framework including, but not
limited to:
1. Evidence-based core math instruction and high-quality
instructional materials grounded in scientifically based math
research;
2. Universal screenings and diagnostic assessments necessary to
identify students at risk for math deficiencies;
3. Progress monitoring and data use to inform instructional
decisions;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 16

4. Family math instruction resources and engagement activities
aligned with classroom instruction; and
5. Professional development and instructional coaching
necessary to implement the district strong math plan.
B. Public 1. In addition to the base mathematics allocation
provided pursuant to subsection A of this section, school districts
receiving more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00)
pursuant to subsection A of this section shall spend no less than
ten percent (10%) to provide professional development for teachers.
The professional development shall include training in
scientifically based math research including how students learn
mathematical concepts; training in providing explicit and systematic
instruction in real-world problem-solving skills, procedural
fluency, conceptual understanding, and productive dispositions;
implementing math strategies that research has shown to be
successful in improving math proficiency among students with math
difficulties; courses leading to a micro-credential in mathematics;
and instructional materials required for implementation shall
receive supplemental weighted funding for students identified
through screening and progress-monitoring data as requiring
additional math intervention services within an MTSS framework. The
State Board of Education shall allocate not less than thirty percent
(30%) of funds appropriated for the purposes of this section to
support supplemental weighted funding and shall promulgate rules
establishing the methodology for calculating weights, documentation
requirements, and procedures for verifying intervention
participation. Supplemental weighted funding shall support
intervention services beyond Tier 1 core instruction and shall be
distributed according to the following categories:
a. Tier 2 supplemental intervention weight: students
identified as requiring targeted math intervention
beyond Tier 1 core instruction shall generate
supplemental funding to support additional
instructional time, reduced group size, and evidence-
based intervention, and
b. Tier 3 intensive intervention weight: students
identified as demonstrating a significant math
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 17

deficiency requiring intensive, individualized, or
highly targeted intervention shall generate
supplemental funding reflecting the increased
instructional intensity required at the Tier 3 level.
2. Supplemental weighted funding received pursuant to this
subsection shall be used exclusively for intervention services
beyond Tier 1 core instruction including:
a. additional instructional time devoted to math
intervention,
b. reduced instructional group sizes necessary to deliver
intensive instruction,
c. specialized instructional materials and intervention
programs aligned with scientifically based math
research,
d. compensation for educators delivering intervention
services, and
e. professional development necessary to ensure educators
providing intervention services have extensive
training in scientifically based math research
including how students learn mathematical concepts;
training in providing explicit and systematic
instruction in real-world problem-solving skills,
procedural fluency, conceptual understanding, and
productive dispositions; implementing math strategies
that research has shown to be successful in improving
math proficiency among students with math
difficulties; and courses leading to a micro-
credential in mathematics.
3. Students shall be counted for purposes of supplemental
weighted funding only when the school district has documented and
electronically reported to the State Department of Education that
the student is receiving intervention services consistent with the
level of instructional intensity required at the applicable tier.
4. School districts shall maintain documentation demonstrating:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 18

a. identification of the student through an approved
screening instrument and supporting diagnostic or
progress-monitoring data,
b. implementation of an intervention plan specifying the
instructional approach, frequency, duration, and group
size of intervention services, and
c. ongoing progress monitoring used to determine the
effectiveness of the intervention and inform
instructional adjustments.
5. Students shall not generate supplemental weighted funding
unless intervention services are provided beyond Tier 1 core
instruction. The State Department of Education may review
intervention documentation and program implementation to verify
eligibility for supplemental weighted funding allocated pursuant to
this section.
6. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules
establishing reasonable expectations for the proportion of students
receiving supplemental and intensive services within an MTSS
framework.
7. When the reported percentage of students receiving Tier 2 or
Tier 3 intervention services significantly exceeds expected ranges,
the State Department of Education may require additional
documentation or provide technical assistance to ensure intervention
services are implemented within the instructional intensity required
at each tier.
C. The State Department of Education shall approve and publish
a list of professional development programs that are evidence-based
and directly address the cognitive science of how students learn
mathematics for which districts are permitted to use the funds
received pursuant to this section.
D. If a teacher attends and completes a professional
development institute in elementary math approved by the Commission
for Educational Quality and Accountability during the summer or when
school is not in session, the teacher may receive a stipend equal to
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 19

the amount of the cost for a substitute teacher, based on the amount
of funds allocated 1. To encourage continuous improvement in
student math outcomes and to support the sustainability of effective
intervention services, the State Board of Education shall allocate
up to thirty percent (30%) of funds appropriated for the purposes of
this section for math improvement incentives and shall promulgate
rules establishing criteria for determining eligibility for such
incentives, which shall include demonstration of measurable
improvement in student math performance.
2. Math improvement incentives may include recognition of:
a. students who demonstrate sufficient progress to exit
Tier 3 intensive intervention,
b. students who demonstrate sufficient progress to exit
Tier 2 supplemental intervention, and
c. school districts or school sites that demonstrate
measurable reductions in the number or percentage of
students requiring supplemental or intensive
intervention.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY Section 5, Chapter 492, O.S.L.
2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1210.903), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1210.903. A. If a teacher determines that a student in
second, third, fourth, and fifth grade is performing above grade
level in mathematics by the start of the second quarter of the
school year, the parent or legal guardian of the student shall be
notified of:
1. The math proficiency level of the student;
2. The program of advanced math instruction available for the
student; and
3. The potential for the student to participate in a summer
academy or other program designed to assist the student in excelling
in mathematics.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 20

B. If a teacher determines that a student in second, third,
fourth, and or fifth grade is not performing at grade level in
mathematics by the start of the second quarter of the school year,
the parent or legal guardian of the student shall be notified of:
1. The math proficiency level of the student;
2. The program of math instruction for the student as required
pursuant to this act the Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency
Act; and
3. The potential need for the student to participate in a
summer academy or other program designed to assist the student in
attaining grade-level math proficiency.
C. A teacher who determines a student in second, third, fourth,
and or fifth grade is exceeding or not meeting grade-level targets
for mathematics may, after consultation with the parent or legal
guardian of the student, recommend that the student participate in
and complete a summer academy or other program.
D. Summer academy programs shall be designed to ensure that
participating students successfully complete an advanced
mathematical program or grade-level competencies in mathematics to
enhance next-grade readiness. A summer academy math program shall
be a program that incorporates the content of a scientifically
research-based professional development program administered by the
Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability or a
scientifically research-based math program administered by the State
Board of Education which is taught by teachers who have successfully
completed professional development in the math program. All summer
academy programs shall consist of a minimum of three (3) consecutive
days. The State Department of Education shall provide a list of
qualified entities for providing the summer academy programs to all
schools by April 1, 2026.
E. School districts may approve an option for students who are
unable to attend a summer academy. The optional program may
include, but not be limited to, an approved private provider of
instruction, approved computer- or Internet-based instruction, or an
approved program of math instruction monitored by the parent or
legal guardian of the student. Public school districts shall not be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 21

required to pay for the optional program but shall clearly
communicate to the parent or legal guardian the expectations of the
program and any costs that may be involved.
F. Subject to the availability of funds, beginning one (1) year
after implementation of this section, the requirements of subsection
C of this section may be expanded to apply to students in first
grade. Each year thereafter, the requirements may be expanded by
one grade level until the requirements apply to kindergarten
students through fifth-grade students. Summer academy programs
shall be designed for each grade level. Nothing in this section
shall prevent the State Board of Education or a school district
board of education from utilizing private, local, or federal funds
to implement the provisions of this section.
G. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section, which shall include
requirements for instructional time for summer academy programs,
teacher qualifications, and evaluation of student achievement as a
result of summer academy programs or other optional programs.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY Section 8, Chapter 492, O.S.L.
2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1210.907), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1210.907. A. Beginning with the 2026-2027 2027-2028
school year and for each school year thereafter, any student
enrolled in second, third, fourth, and fifth grade in a public
school in this state who is assessed through the Oklahoma Math
Achievement and Proficiency Act pursuant to Section 3 1210.901 of
this act title, and who is not meeting grade-level targets in
mathematics after the beginning-of-the-year screening instrument,
shall be screened for dyscalculia. Screening also may be requested
for a student by his or her parent or legal guardian, teacher, or
counselor. A student who is identified with characteristics of
dyscalculia shall not be required to be rescreened unless requested
by his or her parent or legal guardian. Nothing in this section
shall preclude a school district from administering a dyscalculia
screening tool to identify, refer, evaluate, or provide appropriate
services to any student suspected of having dyscalculia or another
math-related disorder prior to the 2027-2028 school year.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 22

B. No later than December 31, 2025 February 28, 2027, the State
Board of Education, in consultation with the Office of Mathematics
Improvement within the State Department of Education, shall develop
policies for dyscalculia screening required pursuant to this section
and shall include, but not be limited to:
1. The definition and characteristics of dyscalculia and
related disorders;
2. The process for referring students in grades two through
five for screening;
3. A process for providing notification to parents or legal
guardians of the use of a qualified dyscalculia-screening
dyscalculia screening tool and notification of the results of the
screening;
4. A process for providing the parents or legal guardians of
students screened for dyscalculia with information and resource
material regarding dyscalculia;
5. A process for monitoring the student’s progress after the
positive identification of characteristics of dyscalculia or other
math-related disorders; and
6. Requirements and qualifications for screeners that
demonstrate an understanding of and training to administer the
screening instrument.
C. The Board shall adopt a list of approved qualified
dyscalculia screening tools based on recommendations from the Office
of Mathematics Improvement within the State Department of Education
that address developmentally appropriate components.
D. Screening shall be conducted in accordance with the policies
developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection B
of this section and the guidance within the dyslexia and dysgraphia
handbook developed pursuant to Section 1210.517 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title including policies and information
developed relating to universal screening of students for
characteristics of dyscalculia.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 23

E. Beginning June 30, 2026 June 30, 2028, and June 30 each year
thereafter, public school districts shall provide the following data
to the State Department of Education:
1. The number of students by grade level in grades two through
five who were screened for dyscalculia in a school year;
2. The number of students by grade level in grades two through
five who were newly identified as having characteristics of
dyscalculia in a school year;
3. The process or tools used to evaluate student progress;
4. The number of trained school system personnel or licensed
professionals used to administer the qualified dyscalculia screening
tool;
5. The number of students in grades two through five who were
participating in interventions within the school setting and the
number of students participating in interventions outside the school
setting; and
6. The programs used by districts for intervention within the
school setting.
F. The State Department of Education shall designate personnel
to provide technical assistance to implement the provisions of this
act the Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency Act.
G. By December 31, 2026 December 31, 2028, and by December 31
each year thereafter, the State Department of Education shall
electronically provide a report containing all of the data provided
pursuant to subsection E of this section to the Governor and
Legislature and make the report available on the Department’s
website.
H. As funds are available, beginning with the 2026-2027 school
year, the Department shall provide training on the best practices
for screening for dyscalculia.
I. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 24

SECTION 7. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 8. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 25

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1360 Page 26